District of Columbia statutes.
3-1203.02

Responsibilities of Mayor.

The Mayor shall be responsible for:

(1)

Planning, developing, and maintaining procedures to ensure that the boards receive administrative support, including staff and facilities, sufficient to enable them to perform their responsibilities;

(2)

Processing and providing licenses as required and approved by the boards;

(3)

Providing investigative and inspection services;

(4)

Holding hearings on cases pursuant to guidelines established in § 3-1205.19 when requested to do so by the board, and appointing hearing officers to enable the boards to hold hearings;

(5)

Furnishing expert services in noncompliance cases brought in an administrative or court proceeding;

(6)

Providing budgetary and personnel services;

(7)

Maintaining central files of records pertaining to licensure, inspections, investigations, and other matters requested by the boards;

(8)

Furnishing facilities and staff for hearings and other proceedings;

(9)

Providing information to the public concerning licensing requirements and procedures;

(10)

Publishing and distributing procedural manuals concerning licensing and inspections and other materials prepared by the boards;

(11)

Assisting, supplying, furnishing, and performing other administrative, clerical, and technical support the Mayor determines is necessary or appropriate;

(12)

Issuing rules, as the Mayor may periodically determine to be necessary to protect the health and welfare of the citizens of the District, for the temporary licensure for a fixed period of time not to exceed 90 days and under conditions to be prescribed by the Mayor by rule, of applicants for licensure to practice a health occupation in the District, except the Mayor may provide for the issuance of temporary licenses to applicants for licensure to practice social work and marriage and family therapy for a period not to exceed 1 year, and to applicants for licensure to practice as anesthesiologist assistants for a period not to exceed 2 years;

(13)

Making necessary rules relating to the administrative procedures of the boards; and

(14)

Issuing all rules necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 302, 33 DCR 729
Oct. 1, 1992, D.C. Law 9-165, § 2, 39 DCR 5817
Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-88, § 2(e), 50 DCR 10999
Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-237, § 2(d), 51 DCR 10593
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 17(b), 53 DCR 6794
District of Columbia Nursing Home Advisory Commission established: See Mayor’s Order 88-60, March 15, 1988.
Delegation of authority pursuant to the “District of Columbia Health Occupations Revision Act of 1985”, see Mayor’s Order 98-140, August 20, 1998 ( 45 DCR 6593).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the District of Columbia Health Occupations Revision Act of 1985 Temporary Licensure of Social Workers Emergency Amendment Act of 1992 (D.C. Act 9-148, January 28, 1992, 39 DCR 714). Section 3 of D.C. Act 9-148 provided that any 90-day temporary licenses to practice social work issued prior to January 28, 1992, shall be extended automatically for a period of 1 year from the date the license was issued, subject to any conditions prescribed by the mayor pursuant to § 302(12) of the act.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of District of Columbia Health Occupations Revision Act of 1985 Temporary Licensure of Social Workers Temporary Amendment Act of 1992 (D.C. Law 9-92, April 8, 1992, law notification 39 DCR 2858).
D.C. Law 16-191, in par. (12), validated a previously made technical correction.
D.C. Law 15-237, in par. (12), substituted “to exceed 1 year, and to applicants for licensure to practice as anesthesiologist assistants for a period not to exceed 2 years;” for “exceeding 1 year;”.
D.C. Law 15-88, in par. (12), substituted “social work and marriage and family therapy” for “social work”.
1981 Ed., § 2-3303.2.
This section is referenced in § 3-1205.04.